Illinois, session 104th, HB5704.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The sum of $1,000,000, or so much of that amount 5as may be necessary, is appropriated from the General Revenue 6Fund to the Department of Human Services for a grant to Special 7Olympics Illinois for costs associated with contingent and 8operational expenses. 9    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect July 1, 102026.